Florida, session 2026, SB1656.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 113 114 Section 1.âSection 15.0465, Florida Statutes, is amended to 115 read: 116 15.0465âOfficial state flagship.âThe S.S. American Victory, 117 a 455-foot historic steamship built in 1944 schooner Western 118 Union, a 130-foot historic sailing vessel of the tall ship 119 class, built in Key West and first launched in 1939, is 120 designated the official state flagship. 121 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.